Utah statutes.
58-37b-7.   Advertisement of substance unlawful -- Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to place any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication, or to post or distribute in any public place, any advertisement or solicitation with reasonable knowledge that the purpose of the advertisement or solicitation is to promote the distribution of imitation controlled substances.  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 241, 1991 General Session

